Utah statutes.
70D-3-302.   Examination.

(1)  Before an individual may be licensed under this chapter, the individual shall pass a written examination that:

(a)  meets the requirements of 12 U.S.C. Sec. 5104(d);

(b)  is developed by the nationwide database; and

(c)  is administered by an approved examination provider.

(2)  The commissioner shall make rules made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, that:

(a)  require that an individual comply at a minimum with the standards of 12 U.S.C. Sec. 5104(d); and

(b)  address:

(i)  what constitutes passing a written examination;

(ii)  the ability of an individual to retake a written examination if the individual fails the written examination; and

(iii)  when an individual is required to retake a written examination if an individual fails to maintain a valid license under this chapter after taking the written examination.

